Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB351.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5113. Enforcement of State law.(a) Offense defined.--(1) An elected official of a municipality commits a misdemeanor of the first degree if the elected official votes in favor of or approves of a law, regulation or policy that: (i) permits, or otherwise decriminalizes, an activity that is illegal or prohibited under the laws of this Commonwealth;(ii) prohibits the enforcement of a penalty or fine for an offense under the laws of this Commonwealth or establishes a penalty or fine for the offense that is 12345678910111213141516171819 different from the penalty or fine required for the offense under the laws of this Commonwealth;(iii) directs or induces a peace officer to not enforce a law of this Commonwealth; or(iv) provides an alternate method to address the prohibitions or penalties existing under the laws of this Commonwealth.(2) An elected official of a municipality or public employee of a municipality commits a misdemeanor of the first degree if the elected official or public employee directs or induces a peace officer under the command or sup ervision of the elected official or public employee to: (i) permit an activity that is illegal or prohibited under the laws of this Commonwealth;(ii) not enforce a penalty or fine for an offense under the laws of this Commonwealth or enforce a penalty or fine for the offense that is different from the penalty or fine required for the offense under the laws of this Commonwealth;(iii) provide an alternate method to address a prohibition or penalty under the laws of this Commonwealth; or(iv) not enforce a law of this Commonwealth.(b) Previous law, regulation or policy voided.--A law, regulation or policy adopted or implemented by a municipality, elected official or public employee negating or limiting the enforcement of a law of this Commonwealth is declared null and void and of no further force or effect.(c) Exception.--This section shall not apply to the following:20250HB0351PN0305 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The Attorney General, or a subordinate acting under the direction of the Attorney General.(2) A district attorney, or a subordinate acting under the direction of a district attorney.(3) A peace officer.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Law of this Commonwealth." A statute enacted by the General Assembly and approved as a law in accordance with the Constitution of Pennsylvania."Peace officer." As defined under section 501 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0351PN0305 - 3 - 1234567891011121314